Montana, session 2025, HB926.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Transfer of interest earnings from debt and liability free account. By
[10 days after the effective date of this act], the state treasurer shall transfer all unobligated and unexpended
funds from the debt and liability free account established in 17-6-214 into the coal severance tax permanent
fund established in 17-5-703 pursuant to Article IX, section 5, of the Montana constitution.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Appropriation. There is appropriated $100 from the general fund to the
department of revenue for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, for the purposes of implementing [this act].

COORDINATION SECTION. Section 3. Coordination instruction. If [this act] is passed and
approved and Senate Bill No. 90 is not passed and approved, then [section 1 of this act] must be amended as
follows:
"NEW SECTION. Section 1. Transfer of interest earnings from debt and liability free account.
By [10 days after the effective date of this act], the state treasurer shall transfer all unobligated and unexpended
funds in the debt and liability free account established in 17-6-214 into the Montana school facilities fund
established in 17-5-703."

NEW SECTION. Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 926